Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 3. Trapping Cabins.

Administrative Code. —

For trapping cabin construction permits, see 11 AAC 94.

Sec. 38.95.075.
Permits for the use of trapping cabins.

Except where a resource management conflict exists, the commissioner shall issue a nonexclusive, nontransferable permit to an individual for the use of a trapping cabin when the applicant provides to the commissioner a verified statement by the local fish and game advisory committee of the area in which the cabin is located that states that

the applicant had used the cabin on a regular basis for trapping before August 1, 1984;

the past, present, and intended use of the cabin is for temporary shelter while trapping; and

the applicant is the owner of the cabin or has the concurrence of the owner of the cabin or there is no owner of the cabin.

History.

(§ 1 ch 45 SLA 1986)

Collateral references. —

73B C.J.S., Public Lands, § 197.

Sec. 38.95.080.
Trapping cabin construction permits.

The commissioner may issue a nontransferable permit for the construction of a trapping cabin on state land to a person who meets the following qualifications:

the person must have an established trapline with proof of regular use;

the person must have a trapline of sufficient length to justify the need for cabin construction.

Nothing in (a) of this section prevents the director from issuing a permit to more than one qualified person for the construction and use of the same trapping cabin.

The director shall establish, by regulation, conditions attaching to the permit issued under (a) and (b) of this section. These conditions shall include the following:

permits shall be issued for a period of not more than 10 years, with succeeding 10-year renewal options, if periodic use and occupancy is established, and the qualifications of (a) of this section continue to be met;

a cabin shall be constructed and maintained according to reasonable specifications established by the director; one cabin constructed under a permit may contain not more than 400 square feet; however, in no case may another cabin constructed under the same permit exceed 192 square feet;

a permit shall specify the number of cabins allowed to be constructed and indicate their specific geographical location; the director may establish a maximum number of cabins per person or otherwise limit their number because of the probability of adverse consequences;

adequate provision must be made for waste and garbage disposal, as determined by the director;

the payment of a trapping cabin permit fee of $10.

A permit issued under (a) and (b) of this section entitles its holder to use timber in the immediate vicinity of the cabin for personal noncommercial purposes only. No ownership rights to the land are conveyed by the issuance of a trapping cabin permit under this section.

A person who makes a false statement as to any material fact relating to a permit issued under this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. A person who violates this subsection or any of the terms and conditions of a permit issued under this section may have the permit immediately revoked and is subject to payment of all costs required in dismantling the cabin structure.

History.

(§ 1 ch 115 SLA 1976; am § 40 ch 113 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 41 SLA 1982; am § 76 ch 152 SLA 1984)

Cross references. —

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

for fines and

12.55.135

for imprisonment.

Administrative Code. —

For applicant qualifications, see 11 AAC 94, art. 1.

For conditions of permit, see 11 AAC 94, art. 2.

For renewal and termination, see 11 AAC 94, art. 3.

Sec. 38.95.085.
Definitions for AS 38.95.075 — 38.95.085.

In AS

38.95.075

—

38.95.085

,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of natural resources;

“director” means the director of the division of lands.

History.

(§ 16 ch 22 SLA 2001)

Cross references. —

For director of division of lands, see AS

38.05.010

.